South Dakota, session 2026, SB3.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 11-10:
Notwithstanding any authority granted to a county, municipality, or township to
prescribe building codes or standards or to issue building permits, a county, municipality,
or township may not require a building permit for the repair or substantially similar
replacement of any of the following existing exterior parts of a detached single-family
owner-occupied residential structure:
(1) Door, if the dimensions remain the same;
(2) Downspout;
(3) Fascia,
(4) Fencing panel or post;
(5) Gutter;
(6) Siding, if nonstructural;
(7) Soffit; and
(8) Window, if the dimensions remain the same.
Nothing in this section relieves a homeowner from compliance with any other
applicable building code or ordinance.
A county, municipality, or township may require building permits for repairs
pursuant to this section or substantially similar replacements for exterior parts of any
designated historical property as authorized under chapter 1-19B.

26.34.25 2 3
An Act to limit the types of residential improvements for which counties, municipalities, and
townships may require a permit.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 3
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 3 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB3 ENROLLED